Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3517
Adjoining counties; reports; county board actions; voter approval; construction of sections.

Sections 23-3501 to 23-3509 shall apply to any facility or facilities established pursuant to section 23-3515. For purposes of sections 23-3515 to 23-3519, whenever such sections: (1) Require the making of any report to the county board, such report shall be made to the county board of each county concerned; (2) authorize or require the taking of any action by the county board, such action shall be concurred in by the county board of each county concerned; and (3) provide for the submission of any question to the voters before any action may be taken, such question shall be submitted to the voters of each county concerned and shall be approved by a majority vote of the electors voting on such question in each such county.

Laws 1957, c. 64, § 5, p. 287;

Laws 1963, c. 114, § 15, p. 456;

Laws 1967, c. 121, § 15, p. 394;

Laws 1987, LB 134, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.17.